src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-3-kîskiswîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # X
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-kî-kîskisokawiyân # as someone played me
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-kî-kîskisokawiyan # as someone played you
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-kî-kîskisoht # as someone played him/her
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-kî-kîskisokawiyâhk # as someone played us
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-kî-kîskisokawiyahk # as someone played you and us
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-kî-kîskisokawiyîk # as someone played you all
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-kî-kîskisohcik # as someone played them
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-kîskisomiht # as someone played another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-kîskisokoyân
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-kîskisokoyan
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-kîskisokot
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-kîskisokoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-kîskisokoyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-kîskisokoyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-kîskisokocik
      PV/î+PV/ki+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-kîskisokothit
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwî-kîskisotin # I am going to play you
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwî-kîskiswâw # I am going to play him/her
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kiwî-kîskisotinâwâw # I am going to play you all
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: niwî-kîskiswâwak # I am going to play them
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwî-kîskisomâwa # I am going to play another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-kîskison # you are going to play me
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwî-kîskiswâw # you are going to play him/her
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-kîskisonân # you are going to play us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-kîskiswâwak # you are going to play them
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-kîskisomâwa # you are going to play another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-kîskison # you are going to play me
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kiwî-kîskisok # he/she is going to play you
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-kîskisonân # you are going to play us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kiwî-kîskisokonaw # he/she is going to play you and us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kiwî-kîskisokowâw # he/she is going to play you all
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-kîskiswâwak # you are going to play them
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-kîskisomâwa # you are going to play another/others
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wî-kîskisomîw # he/she is going to play yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kiwî-kîskisotinân # we are going to play you
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: niwî-kîskiswânân # we are going to play him/her
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kiwî-kîskisotinân # we are going to play you all
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: niwî-kîskiswânânak # we are going to play them
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwî-kîskisomânâna # we are going to play another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kiwî-kîskiswânaw # we and you are going to play him/her
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kiwî-kîskiswânawak # we and you are going to play them
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-kîskisomânawa # we and you are going to play another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kiwî-kîskisonâwâw # you all are going to play me
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kiwî-kîskiswâwâw # you all are going to play him/her
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kiwî-kîskisonân # you all are going to play us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kiwî-kîskiswâwâwak # you all are going to play them
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-kîskisomâwâwa # you all are going to play another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: niwî-kîskisokwak # they are going to play me
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kiwî-kîskisokwak # they are going to play you
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: niwî-kîskisokonânak # they are going to play us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kiwî-kîskisokonawak # they are going to play you and us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kiwî-kîskisokowâwak # they are going to play you all
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wî-kîskiswîwak # they are going to play another/others
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wî-kîskisomîwak # they are going to play yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: niwî-kîskisokothiwa # another/others are going to play me
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kiwî-kîskisokothiwa # another/others are going to play you
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [wî-kîskisokow, wî-kîskisok] # another/others are going to play him/her
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: niwî-kîskisokonâna # another/others are going to play us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kiwî-kîskisokonawa # another/others are going to play you and us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kiwî-kîskisokowâwa # another/others are going to play you all
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [wî-kîskisokowak, wî-kîskisokwak] # another/others are going to play them
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wî-kîskiswîthiwa # another/others are going to play yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wî-kîskisokothiwa # yet another/others are going to play another/others

      # X
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: niwî-kîskisokawin # someone is going to play me
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kiwî-kîskisokawin # someone is going to play you
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: wî-kîskiswâw # someone is going to play him/her
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: niwî-kîskisokawinân # someone is going to play us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kiwî-kîskisokawinaw, kiwî-kîskisokawinânaw] # someone is going to play you and us
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kiwî-kîskisokawinâwâw # someone is going to play you all
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: wî-kîskiswâwak # someone is going to play them
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: wî-kîskiswâthiwa # someone is going to play another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: niwî-kîskisokon
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: kiwî-kîskisokon
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: wî-kîskisokow
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: niwî-kîskisokonân
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: kiwî-kîskisokonaw
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: kiwî-kîskisokowâw
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: wî-kîskisokowak
      PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wî-kîskisokothiwa
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-wî-kîskisotân # as I am going to play you
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-wî-kîskiswak # as I am going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-wî-kîskisotakwâw # as I am going to play you all
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-wî-kîskiswakwâw # as I am going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskiswaki # as I am going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomak # as I am going to play another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wî-kîskisoyan # as you are going to play me
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-wî-kîskiswat # as you are going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-wî-kîskisoyâhk # as you are going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-wî-kîskiswacik # as you are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomat # as you are going to play another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wî-kîskisoyan # as you are going to play me
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-wî-kîskisosk # as he/she is going to play you
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-wî-kîskisoyâhk # as you are going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyâhk # as s/he is going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskisoyamiht # as s/he is going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyahk # as he/she is going to play you and us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskisotahk # as he/she is going to play you and us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyîk # as he/she is going to play you all
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskisotîk # as he/she is going to play you all
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-wî-kîskiswacik # as you are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomat # as you are going to play another/others
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomât # as he/she is going to play yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-wî-kîskisotâhk # as we are going to play you
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-wî-kîskiswâyâhk # as we are going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskiswakiht # as we are going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-wî-kîskisotâhk # as we are going to play you all
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-wî-kîskiswâyâhkwâw # as we are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskiswakihcik # as we are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomâyâhk # as we are going to play another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-wî-kîskiswâyahk # as we and you are going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskiswahk # as we and you are going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-wî-kîskiswâyahkwâw # as we and you are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskiswahkwâw # as we and you are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomâyahk # as we and you are going to play another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-wî-kîskisoyîk # as you all are going to play me
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-wî-kîskiswâyîk # as you all are going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-wî-kîskisoyâhk # as you all are going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-wî-kîskiswâyîkwâw # as you all are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskiswâyîkok # as you all are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomâyîk # as you all are going to play another/others
